North Dakota, session 69, HB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-07-25.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-07-25.4. Virtual learning - School district policy - Report to legislative management and
legislative assembly.
1. The board of a school district or governing board of a nonpublic school that operates a
physical school plant may adopt a policy to allow students to engage in virtual instruction and
in the case of a school district, qualify for average daily membership in the district.
2. A resident school district may not deny open enrollment to an approved virtual school.
2.3. A student or a student's family member may not receive any item, service, or thing of value not
given in exchange for fair market consideration from a vendor providing instruction or support
under this section.
3.4. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules governing policies under this section.
5. A policy adopted by a school district under this section must comply:
a. Must comply with the rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
b. May require registration for virtual instruction to coincide with the school district course
registration schedule and deadlines.
c. May require that students meet prerequisites to ensure readiness for sequential virtual
courses.
d. Must require the school district to pay for a virtual instruction course if the school district
does not offer the course and obtaining the course credit would contribute to the student
meeting high school graduation requirements in time to graduate within the usual time
frame.
e. May establish the minimum number of courses a student is required to take onsite,
whether virtual or in person. The policy may not unreasonably restrict student access to
virtual school options and must comply with laws and administrative rules applicable to
onsite students, as distinguished from virtual academy students.
f. May grant discretion to the school district to determine whether to pay for a virtual
instruction course retake.
4.6. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide an annual report to either the legislative
management or the legislative assembly. In odd-numbered years, the report must be made to
the legislative assembly. In even-numbered years, the report must be made to the legislative
management. The annual report must:

H. B. NO. 1105 - PAGE 2
a. Contain a comparison of the academic performance of students participating in virtual
instruction against students not participating in virtual instruction under this section; and
b. Use the statewide prekindergarten through grade twelve strategic vision framework
goals.
5.7. If the superintendent of public instruction does not have access to academic performance
reports of a school district's virtual instruction subgroup because of the low group size, the
district shall provide the annual report required under this section for the district's comparison
data.
6.8. Students enrolled in an approved virtual school do not generate school district sized weighting
factors pursuant to section 15.1-27-03.2.

H. B. NO. 1105 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1105.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State